Utah statutes.
39-6-98.   Theft -- Wrongful conversion.
(1)  A person subject to this chapter who unlawfully takes, obtains, or
withholds, by any means, from the possession of the owner or from any other
person any money, personal property, or article of value of any kind:
(a)  with intent permanently to deprive or defraud another person of the use
and benefit of property or to appropriate it to his own use or the use of any
person other than the owner, is guilty of theft; or
(b)  with intent to temporarily deprive or defraud another person of the use
and benefit of property or to convert the property to his own use or the use
of any other person other than the owner, is guilty of wrongful conversion.
(2)  A person found guilty of theft or wrongful conversion shall be punished
as a military court directs.
